Louisiana, session 2026, HB969.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 4:176(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§176. Limitation of time for presenting pari-mutuel tickets and disposition of
unclaimed monies
* * *
B. The sum held by any licensee for payment of outstanding winning
pari-mutuel tickets and for refunding the price of pari-mutuel tickets shall be retained
by such licensee for such purpose until the expiration of ninety days after the close
of the race meeting conducted by the licensee. One hundred days after the close of
any race meeting, the licensee shall each day accumulate the amount equal to the
sum of the unclaimed monies that expire that day. On or before the fifteenth day of
the first month following the end of a calendar-year quarter, the licensee shall remit
less the amount of state tax paid by the licensee on such unclaimed monies, to the
state treasurer for deposit into the Crime Victims Reparations Victims'
Compensation Fund as provided for in R.S. 46:1816(B)(8) an amount equal to the
accumulated total for the previous calendar-year quarter. Such funds shall be used
exclusively to pay the expenses associated with health care healthcare services of
victims of sexually oriented criminal offenses, including forensic medical
examinations as defined in R.S. 15:622.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 10:9-406(i) and 9-408(f) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§9-406. Discharge of account debtor; notification of assignment; identification and
proof of assignment; restrictions on assignment of accounts, chattel paper,
payment intangibles, and promissory notes ineffective
* * *
(i) Inapplicability. This Section does not apply to an assignment of a health-
care-insurance receivable. This Section further does not apply to an assignment of
Page 2 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
any pension, disability, annuity, retirement or other benefit, distribution or allowance
right or payment from any governmental retirement system or pension fund or any
other governmental unit, workers' compensation claims or payments, unemployment
compensation benefits, public assistance payments, crime victim reparations
compensation, or lottery payments.
* * *
§9-408. Restrictions on assignment of promissory notes, health-care-insurance
receivables, and certain general intangibles ineffective
* * *
(f) Inapplicability. This Section does not apply to an assignment of any
pension, disability, annuity, retirement or other benefit, distribution or allowance
right or payment from any governmental retirement system or pension fund or any
other governmental unit, workers' compensation claims or payments, unemployment
compensation benefits, public assistance payments, crime victim reparations
compensation, or lottery payments.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 15:574.4.2(C)(1), 705(C)(3)(a) and (D)(3), 874(7), 875(E), and 1223
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§574.4.2. Decisions of committee on parole; nature, order, and conditions of parole;
rules of conduct; infectious disease testing
* * *
C.(1)(a) When a victim of the crime for which parole is being considered has
suffered a direct pecuniary loss other than damage to or loss of property, the parole
committee may impose as a condition of parole that restitution be made to the victim.
When such a condition is imposed, the committee shall consider the defendant's
ability to pay and shall not revoke parole based upon this condition unless the
parolee has willfully failed to comply. When the victim's loss consists of damage to
or loss of property, the committee shall impose as a condition of parole payment of
restitution, either in a lump sum or in monthly installments based on the earning
capacity and assets of the defendant. If the victim was paid for such property loss
Page 3 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
or damage with monies from the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation
Fund, the committee shall order the parolee to make such payments as
reimbursement to the fund in the same amount as was paid from the fund to the
victim. This condition of parole shall continue until such time as the restitution is
paid or the parolee is discharged from parole in accordance with R.S. 15:574.6.
(b) If restitution to the victim is ordered as a condition of parole in
accordance with the provisions of this Subsection and the victim cannot be located
by the probation and parole officer within one year after the condition is imposed,
the defendant shall direct the restitution payments to the Crime Victims Reparations
Victims' Compensation Fund as provided for in R.S. 46:1816.
* * *
§705. Food and clothing provisions for prisoners; payment of incarceration
expenses; payment of medical expenses; imposition of restitution on
offenders
* * *
C.
* * *
(3)(a) Each governing authority shall establish written rules for the collection
of such expenses from the inmate, including freezing assets in his drawing account
and prohibiting withdrawals therefrom until the expenses are paid. The drawing
account may be frozen regardless of the source of the assets contained therein.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the governing authority shall
promulgate rules and regulations regarding reimbursement by the inmate for medical
expenses incurred by the governing authority for the inmate's treatment, including
a requirement that the inmate file a claim with his private medical or health care
healthcare insurer or any public medical assistance program, under which he is
covered and from which the inmate may make a claim for payment or reimbursement
of the cost of any such medical treatment. This Subsection shall does not prohibit
the withdrawal of funds for the purpose of payments under the Crime Victims
Page 4 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
Reparations Victims' Compensation Act, court costs as authorized by law, and other
withdrawals specifically authorized by the sheriff, in that order.
* * *
D.
* * *
(3) Each law enforcement district may adopt an ordinance authorizing the
chief law enforcement officer of the district to collect such restitution from the
inmate. The ordinance may provide for the freezing of assets in his drawing account
and prohibit withdrawals therefrom until the expenses are paid. The drawing
account may be frozen regardless of the source of the assets contained therein in the
account. This Subsection shall does not prohibit the withdrawal of funds for the
purpose of payments under the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation
Act, court costs as authorized by law, other payments required by the sentencing
judge, and other withdrawals specifically authorized by the chief law enforcement
officer of the district, in that order.
* * *
§874. Compensation account
The inmate's compensation account shall be handled and accounted for as
follows:
* * *
(7) Upon presentation to the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
of a court order or a certified copy of an extract of the minutes of a court proceeding
showing that an inmate was convicted and was assessed court costs, along with a
letter from the sheriff itemizing the costs assessed and verifying which of the costs
were not paid, the department shall withdraw funds from any of the inmate's
accounts for the payment of court costs due. All collected funds so collected shall
be forwarded to the court that assessed the costs; however, if the inmate has not paid
the costs assessed in accordance with the Crime Victims Reparations Victims'
Compensation Act, R.S. 46:1801, et seq., those costs shall be collected and shall be
credited directly to the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Fund,
Page 5 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
R.S. 46:1816, after all other costs are paid. The department shall notify the court if
the costs for the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Fund have been
collected. The funds in an inmate's accounts shall not be reduced by more than
seventy-five percent in accordance with this Section.
* * *
§875. Imposition of restitution on offenders; procedures
* * *
E. The amount of restitution may be obtained from an offender by freezing
assets in his drawing and savings account and prohibiting withdrawals therefrom
until the restitution is paid, whether from these accounts or from any other source by
any other appropriate means. The accounts may be frozen regardless of the source
of the assets contained therein and specifically including any assets of a juvenile sent
to him by his parent or guardian and placed in his accounts. This Subsection shall
does not prohibit the withdrawal of funds for the purpose of payments under the
Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Act, court costs as authorized by
law, and other withdrawals specifically authorized by the warden or by the
superintendent if the warden is unavailable, in that order.
* * *
§1223. Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Board
The Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Board as further
provided for in Chapter 21 of Title 46 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 is
hereby placed under the jurisdiction of the Louisiana Commission on Law
Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice.
Section 4. R.S. 27:94(C), 252(C), 394(C), and 610(A)(3)(c) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§94. Ninety-day time period to claim jackpot ticket; collection and use of funds
* * *
C. After such time, the licensee shall each day accumulate the amount equal
to the sum of any unclaimed monies, less the amount of state tax paid by the licensee
on the unclaimed monies that expire that day. On or before the fifteenth day of the
Page 6 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
first month following the end of a calendar-year quarter, the licensee shall remit to
the state treasurer for deposit into the Crime Victims Reparations Victims'
Compensation Fund as provided for in R.S. 46:1816(B)(8) an amount equal to the
accumulated total for the previous calendar-year quarter. The funds shall be used
exclusively to pay the expenses associated with health care healthcare services of
victims of sexually oriented criminal offenses, including forensic medical
examinations as defined in R.S. 15:622.
* * *
§252. Ninety-day time period to claim jackpot ticket; collection and use of funds
* * *
C. After such time, the licensee shall each day accumulate the amount equal
to the sum of any unclaimed monies, less the amount of state tax paid by the licensee
on the unclaimed monies that expire that day. On or before the fifteenth day of the
first month following the end of a calendar-year quarter, the licensee shall remit to
the state treasurer for deposit into the Crime Victims Reparations Victims'
Compensation Fund as provided for in R.S. 46:1816(B)(8) an amount equal to the
accumulated total for the previous calendar-year quarter. The funds shall be used
exclusively to pay the expenses associated with health care healthcare services of
victims of sexually oriented criminal offenses, including forensic medical
examinations as defined in R.S. 15:622.
* * *
§394. Ninety-day time period to claim jackpot ticket; collection and use of funds
* * *
C. After such time, the licensee shall each day accumulate the amount equal
to the sum of any unclaimed monies, less the amount of state tax paid by the licensee
on the unclaimed monies that expire that day. On or before the fifteenth day of the
first month following the end of a calendar-year quarter, the licensee shall remit to
the state treasurer for deposit into the Crime Victims Reparations Victims'
Compensation Fund as provided for in R.S. 46:1816(B)(8) an amount equal to the
accumulated total for the previous calendar-year quarter. The funds shall be used
Page 7 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
exclusively to pay the expenses associated with health care healthcare services of
victims of sexually oriented criminal offenses, including forensic medical
examinations as defined in R.S. 15:622.
* * *
§610. Payment of winnings; collection and use of funds
A.
* * *
(3)
* * *
(c) After such time, the operator shall each day accumulate the amount equal
to the sum of any unclaimed winnings, less the amount of state tax paid by the
licensee on the unclaimed monies that expire that day. On or before the fifteenth day
of the first month following the end of a calendar-year quarter, the licensee shall
remit to the state treasurer for deposit into the Crime Victims Reparations Victims'
Compensation Fund as provided for in R.S. 46:1816 an amount equal to the
accumulated total for the previous calendar-year quarter. The funds shall be used
exclusively to pay the expenses associated with health care healthcare services of
victims of sexually oriented criminal offenses, including forensic medical
examinations as defined in R.S. 15:622.
* * *
Section 5. R.S. 32:865(B)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§865. Criminal sanctions for operating motor vehicle not covered by security
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) Notwithstanding Paragraph (1) of this Subsection and except as provided
in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection, any person operating a motor vehicle when that
person knows the vehicle is not covered by the security required under R.S. 32:861,
and any owner allowing a motor vehicle to be operated which is in any way involved
in an accident within this state in which any person is killed or injured or in which
Page 8 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
damage to the property of any one person in excess of five hundred dollars is
sustained, when such motor vehicle is not covered by the security required under
R.S. 32:861, the owner thereof knows or has been notified by the department of the
absence of the required security, and at least thirty days has elapsed after such
knowledge has been acquired or notification received by the owner, shall, upon
conviction, be fined not less than one thousand dollars, nor more than ten thousand
dollars, shall have the registration of his vehicle revoked for a period of twelve
months, shall have his driving privileges suspended for a period of twelve months,
and shall be required to perform not less than forty hours nor more than two hundred
hours of community service. After deposit in the Bond Security and Redemption
Fund, an amount equal to all fines collected under the provisions of this Paragraph
shall be credited to the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Fund,
R.S. 46:1816.
* * *
Section 6. R.S. 36:4(B)(11)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4. Structure of executive branch of state government
* * *
B. The office of the governor shall be in the executive branch of state
government. The governor may allocate within his office the powers, duties, funds,
functions, appropriations, responsibilities, and personnel of the agencies within his
office and provide for the administration thereof and for the organization of his
office. The following agencies and their powers, duties, functions, and
responsibilities are hereby transferred to the office of the governor:
* * *
(11) Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration of
Criminal Justice ( R.S. 15:1201 et seq.). The following agencies are placed under
the jurisdiction of the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and
Administration of Criminal Justice:
* * *
Page 9 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(b) Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Board (R.S. 46:1801
and R.S. 15:1223).
* * *
Section 7. R.S. 40:1216.1(A)(introductory paragraph) and (6)(introductory
paragraph) and (b) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1216.1. Procedures for survivors of a sexually oriented criminal offense;
immunity; regional plans; maximum allowable costs; definitions; documents
requested by victim
A. All licensed hospitals and healthcare providers in Louisiana this state
shall offer every sexual assault survivor information to receive the treatment
provided for in this Section. A licensed hospital or healthcare provider shall adhere
to the following procedures if a person presents for treatment as a sexual assault
survivor:
* * *
(6) The healthcare provider who performed the forensic medical exam
examination and the hospital or healthcare facility shall submit a claim for payment
for conducting a forensic medical exam examination directly to the Crime Victim
Reparations Victims' Compensation Board to be paid in strict accordance with the
provisions of R.S. 46:1822. A survivor of a sexually oriented criminal offense shall
not be billed directly or indirectly for the performance of any forensic medical exam
examination. The provisions of this Paragraph shall not be interpreted or construed
to apply to either of the following:
* * *
(b) A survivor of a sexually oriented criminal offense seeking reparations in
accordance with the provisions of the Crime Victims Reparations Victims'
Compensation Act, R.S. 46:1801 et seq., for the costs for any medical services that
are not specifically set forth in this Section or provided for the diagnosis or treatment
of the survivor for injuries related to the sexual assault.
* * *
Section 8. R.S. 44:4(28) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 10 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
§4. Applicability
This Chapter shall not apply:
* * *
(28) To the name of any person, contained within or referred to in the
records, papers or files of the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation
Board, applying for or receiving funds from the Crime Victims Reparations Victims'
Compensation Fund. In lieu of the person's name, the person's file number shall be
utilized.
* * *
Section 9. The heading of Chapter 21 of Title 46 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950, R.S. 46:1801, 1802(introductory paragraph), (1) through (4), (5)(introductory
paragraph), (a) through (c), (e), and (f), and (6) through (15), 1803 through 1806, 1807(A),
(B), (C), (D)(1), and (F), 1808, 1809(A), (B), (C), (D)(1)(introductory paragraph) and (b)
and (2), and (E), 1810, 1811(A), (B), and (C), 1812 through 1815, 1816(A), (B)(introductory
paragraph), (4), (5), and (8), (C), (D)(1)(b) and (2), and (E)(2), 1817(A) and (B), 1818
through 1822, 1842(introductory paragraph) and (9), 1844(V) and (W)(1)(a), (3), and (5)(a)
and (c), 1851, 1852(D), and 1853(A), (B)(introductory paragraph) and (2), and (C) are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 46:1802(5)(h) and (16) through (20) are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 21. CRIME VICTIMS REPARATIONS VICTIMS' COMPENSATION
§1801. Short title
This Chapter may be cited as the Crime Victims Reparations Victims'
Compensation Act.
§1802. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Accessory" includes means an accessory after the fact and also a
principal, as those terms are defined by the Louisiana Criminal Code Title 14 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(2) "Board" means the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation
Board.
Page 11 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(3) "Child" means an unmarried person under eighteen years of age, and
includes a natural child, adopted child, stepchild, child born outside of marriage, any
of the above who is a student not over twenty-three years of age, and or a child
conceived prior to but born after the personal injury or death of the victim. who is
either of the following:
(a) An unmarried person who is under eighteen years of age.
(b) An unmarried person who is at least eighteen years of age but under
twenty-four years of age who is currently attending secondary school or enrolled as
a full-time student in a postsecondary educational institution.
(4) "Claimant" means a victim or a dependent of a deceased victim, or the
legal representative of either, an intervenor, the healthcare provider who provides
healthcare services associated with a forensic medical examination as defined in R.S.
15:622, or in the event of a death, a person who legally assumes the obligation or
who voluntarily pays the medical or the funeral or burial expenses incurred as a
direct result of the crime. any of the following who is eligible to file or has filed an
application for compensation pursuant to this Chapter:
(a) A victim.
(b) A dependent of a deceased victim.
(c) An intervenor.
(d) A person legally authorized to act on behalf of a person described in
Subparagraph (a), (b), or (c) of this Paragraph.
(e) A person who legally assumes the obligation or who voluntarily pays
medical or funeral, burial, or cremation expenses of a victim that are incurred as a
direct result of a crime covered under this Chapter.
(f) A deceased victim's family member or household member who requires
psychiatric care or counseling as a direct result of a crime covered under this
Chapter.
(g) A child's parent, stepparent, legal custodian, legal guardian, sibling by
half or whole blood or by adoption, or stepsibling who requires psychiatric care or
Page 12 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
counseling as a direct result of the child being the victim of a sexually oriented
criminal offense.
(h) A person who legally assumes the obligation or who voluntarily pays for
the psychiatric care or counseling of a person described in Subparagraph (f) or (g)
of this Paragraph.
(i) A household member of the victim who voluntarily pays for the
temporary lodging or permanent relocation expenses incurred by the victim as a
direct result of a crime covered under this Chapter.
(j) A household member of the victim who requires temporary lodging or
permanent relocation as a direct result of a crime covered under this Chapter.
(5) "Collateral source" means a source of benefits for pecuniary loss
awardable, other than under this Chapter, which that the victim or claimant has
received or which that is readily available to him or her the victim or claimant from
any or all of the following:
(a) The offender under an order of restitution to the claimant imposed by a
court as a condition of probation or otherwise.
(b) The government of the United States or a federal agency, any of its
agencies, the government of a state or any of its political subdivisions, or an
instrumentality of two or more states.
(c) Social Security, Medicare, and or Medicaid.
* * *
(e) Wage continuation programs of an employer, not including vacation and
sick leave benefits.
(f) Proceeds of a contract of insurance payable to the claimant for a specific
pecuniary loss sustained by the claimant by reason incurred as a direct result of the
crime.
* * *
(h) Damages recovered from the offender or any other third party as a result
of a civil suit.
Page 13 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(6) "Dependent" means a spouse or any person who is a dependent of a
victim within the meaning of Section 152 of the United States Internal Revenue
Code (26 U.S.C. 152). any of the following:
(a) A spouse.
(b) A person who is a dependent of a victim within the meaning of Section
152 of the United States Internal Revenue Code.
(7) "Family member" means the victim's spouse, parent, grandparent,
stepparent, legal custodian, legal guardian, child, grandchild, sibling by half or whole
blood or by adoption, or stepsibling. For the purposes of this Paragraph, "child"
means a natural child, adopted child, stepchild, child born outside of marriage, or
child conceived prior to but born after the personal injury or death of the victim,
regardless of age.
(8) "Forensic medical examination" has the same meaning as defined in R.S.
15:622.
(7) (9) "Healthcare facility" means a facility or institution providing
healthcare services, including but not limited to a hospital or other licensed inpatient
center; ambulatory surgical or treatment center; skilled nursing facility; inpatient
hospice facility; residential treatment center; diagnostic, laboratory, or imaging
center; or rehabilitation or other therapeutic health setting.
(8) (10) "Healthcare provider" means a physician or other healthcare
practitioner licensed, certified, registered, or otherwise authorized to perform
specified healthcare services consistent with state law.
(9) (11) "Healthcare services" means services, items, supplies, or drugs for
the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of a health condition, illness,
injury, or disease ancillary to a sexually oriented criminal offense.
(12) "Household member" means a person who resided in the same
permanent abode as the victim at the time the crime was committed.
(13) "Human trafficking-related offense" means the perpetration or
attempted perpetration of R.S. 14:46.2 or 46.3 or any other crime involving
Page 14 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
commercial exploitation including but not limited to R.S. 14:81.1, 81.3, 82, 82.1,
82.2, 83, 83.1, 83.2, 83.3, 83.4, 84, 85, 86, 89.2, 104, 105, and 282.
(10) (14) "Intervenor" means a person who goes to the aid of another and is
killed or injured who suffers personal injury or death in the good faith effort to
prevent a crime covered by under this Chapter, to apprehend a person reasonably
suspected of having engaged in such a crime, or to aid a peace officer. "Peace
officer" shall include For the purposes of this Paragraph, "peace officer" means
commissioned police officers, sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, marshals, deputy marshals,
correctional officers, constables, wildlife enforcement agents, and probation and
parole officers.
(15) "Louisiana resident" means a person who maintained a place of
permanent abode in this state at the time the crime was committed.
(11) (16) "Pecuniary loss" means the amount of the expense reasonably and
necessarily incurred by reason of the personal injury, as a consequence of death, or
a catastrophic property loss, and includes:
(a) For personal injury: or death suffered by the victim as follows:
(i) (a) Medical, hospital, nursing, or psychiatric care or counseling, and or
physical therapy.
(ii) (b) Actual loss of past earnings and anticipated loss of future earnings
because of a disability resulting from the personal injury or the receipt of medically
indicated services by a victim related to the personal injury.
(iii) (c) Care of a child or dependent.
(iv) Counseling or therapy for the parents or siblings of a child who is the
victim of a sexual crime.
(v) Loss of support for a child victim of a sexual crime not otherwise
compensated for as a pecuniary loss for personal injury.
(vi) Relocation for claimants who have to relocate as a result of the crime for
reasons of personal safety or other reasons reasonably related to the crime.
(b) As a consequence of death:
(i) (d) Funeral, burial, or cremation expenses.
Page 15 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(ii) (e) Loss of support to one or more dependents not otherwise
compensated for as a pecuniary loss for personal injury.
(iii) Care of a child or children enabling the surviving spouse of a victim or
the legal custodian or caretaker of the deceased victim's child or children to engage
in lawful employment, where that expense is not otherwise compensated for as a
pecuniary loss for personal injury.
(iv) Counseling or therapy for any surviving family member of the victim
or any person in close relationship to such victim.
(v) Crime scene cleanup.
(vi) Relocation for claimants who have to relocate as a result of the crime
due to the death of the victim.
(c) As to catastrophic property loss, the loss must be so great as to cause
overwhelming financial effect on the victim or other claimant and shall be restricted
to loss of abode.
(d) Any other expense associated with the collection and securing of crime
scene evidence.
(12) "Pecuniary loss" does not include loss attributable to pain and suffering.
(13) "Reparations" means payment of compensation in accordance with the
provisions of this Chapter for pecuniary loss resulting from physical injury, death,
or catastrophic property loss by reason of a crime enumerated in this Chapter. any
of the following:
(i) A dependent of a deceased victim.
(ii) A child who is the victim of a sexually oriented criminal offense if the
child is a dependent of the offender and the offender is incarcerated as a direct result
of the sexually oriented criminal offense.
(f) Cleaning the crime scene.
(g) Clothing, bedding, or property of the victim seized as evidence or
rendered unusable as a direct result of a criminal investigation.
(h) Temporary lodging or permanent relocation when immediate relocation
is necessary for the health and safety of the victim or the victim's household member.
Page 16 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(i) Costs associated with the removal of a tattoo the victim received through
fraud, force, or coercion as a direct result of a human trafficking-related offense.
(17) "Person" means a natural person.
(18) "Personal injury" means physical or mental harm.
(14) (19) "Sexually oriented criminal offense" shall have has the same
meaning as sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541(24).
(15) (20) "Victim" means any of the following:
(a) Any A person who suffers personal injury, death, or catastrophic property
loss injury or death as a direct result of a crime committed in this state and covered
by under this Chapter. This includes any person who is a victim of human
trafficking as defined by R.S. 14:46.2, a victim of trafficking of children for sexual
purposes as defined by R.S. 14:46.3, or a victim of any offense involving
commercial sexual exploitation including but not limited to R.S. 14:81.1, 81.3, 82,
82.1, 82.2, 83, 83.1, 83.2, 83.3, 83.4, 84, 85, 86, 89.2, 104, 105, and 282.
(b) A Louisiana resident who is a victim of an act of terrorism, as defined in
18 U.S.C. 2331, occurring that occurs outside of the United States.
(c) A Louisiana resident who suffers personal injury or death as a direct
result of a crime described in R.S. 46:1805 covered under this Chapter, except that
the criminal act crime occurred outside of this state. The A Louisiana resident shall
have has the same rights under this Chapter as if the act crime had occurred in this
state upon a showing that the state in which where the act crime occurred does not
have an eligible crime victims reparations victims' compensation program and the
crime would have been compensable had it occurred in Louisiana. In this
Subparagraph, "Louisiana resident" means a person who maintained a place of
permanent abode in this state at the time the crime was committed for which
reparations are sought.
§1803. Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Board
A. The Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Board is created
and established under the jurisdiction of the Louisiana Commission on Law
Page 17 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice in within the office of the
governor. The board shall be domiciled in Baton Rouge.
B. The board shall be composed of the executive director of the Louisiana
Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice or his
designee, one person, who shall be chosen and appointed by the governor, from a list
of three recommendations submitted to the governor by any victim's rights advocacy
organization which is recognized as a nonprofit with the Internal Revenue Service,
incorporated or organized in the state of Louisiana and in good standing, and does
not engage in political activity, with each organization submitting a list of three
names, and nine members who shall be appointed by the governor for a term
concurrent with that of the governor. However, no person nominated by any victim's
rights advocacy organization shall be appointed to serve as a member of the board
who has previously been confirmed by the Senate and has served as a member of the
board. Each appointment shall be submitted to the Senate for confirmation. At least
one member shall be appointed from each of the congressional districts in the state.
Of the governor's nine appointees, at least one shall be a full voting member who
shall be sixty years of age or over and shall serve as a representative of the elderly
population of Louisiana. following members:
(1) The executive director of the Louisiana Commission on Law
Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice, or his designee.
(2)(a) One member, who the governor shall choose and appoint for a term
concurrent with that of the governor, from a list of three recommendations submitted
to the governor by any victims' rights advocacy organization that meets all of the
following:
(i) Recognized as a nonprofit with the Internal Revenue Service.
(ii) Incorporated or organized in this state and in good standing.
(iii) Does not engage in political activity.
(b) Each organization shall submit a list of three names, but no person who
is nominated by any victims' rights advocacy organization shall be appointed to serve
Page 18 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
as a member of the board if he has previously been confirmed by the Senate and has
served as a member of the board.
(3) Eight members, who the governor shall appoint for a term concurrent
with that of the governor, with at least one member being appointed from each of the
congressional districts in this state.
(4) One member, who the governor shall appoint for a term concurrent with
that of the governor, who is sixty years of age or older and shall serve as a
representative of the elderly population of this state.
C. Each gubernatorial appointment is subject to Senate confirmation.
C. D. A vacancy in the membership of the board shall be filled by
appointment by the governor.
D. E. Members shall serve without compensation, but shall be paid a per
diem not in excess of seventy-five dollars and shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses incurred in attendance at meetings of the board and other expenses incurred
on business of the board at its direction.
E. F. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of all business.
F. G. The members of the board shall annually elect from their membership
a chairman and a vice chairman from their membership.
§1804. Eligibility to apply for reparations compensation
A. A person who believes he is a victim of a crime enumerated in R.S.
46:1805, or his legal representative, or in the case of death, a dependent or the legal
representative of a dependent, or the rightful claimant as defined in R.S. 46:1802(4),
shall be covered under this Chapter or a claimant is eligible to make submit an
application to the board for reparations compensation and shall be is eligible for an
award of reparations compensation in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.
B. During the sentencing for a crime, the judge shall inform the victim of the
crime, or his legal representative, or in the case of death, a dependent or the legal
representative of a dependent or the rightful claimant, the legal counsel of the victim,
or a claimant of the potential eligibility for an award of reparations compensation.
Page 19 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
The judge shall also provide the contact information for the Crime Victims
Reparations Board board to such the persons described in this Subsection for the
purpose of submitting an application to the board for an award of reparations
compensation.
§1805. Crimes to which applicable to this Chapter applies
A. The board may make an award and order the payment of reparations
compensation for pecuniary loss incurred in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter for the personal injury, death, or catastrophic property loss resulting from
any act or omission to act that is defined as a misdemeanor under any local ordinance
or as a crime under state or federal law and involves the use of force or the threat of
the use of force or any human trafficking-related offense.
B.(1) For the purposes of this Chapter, the operation of a motor vehicle, boat,
or aircraft that results in personal injury or death shall not constitute a crime unless
the personal injury or death was intentionally inflicted through the use of such
vehicle, boat, or aircraft, or was caused by an operator in violation of R.S. 14:98,
98.1, or 100.
(2) "Intentionally inflicted" includes, but is not limited to personal injury or
death resulting due to operation of a motor vehicle, boat, or aircraft used to flee the
scene of a crime in which the operator of the motor vehicle, boat, or aircraft
knowingly participated.
(3) "Human trafficking-related offense" shall include the perpetration or
attempted perpetration of R.S. 14:46.2 or 46.3 or any other crime involving
commercial exploitation including R.S. 14:81.1, 81.3, 82, 82.1, 82.2, 83, 83.1, 83.2,
83.3, 83.4, 84, 85, 86, 89.2, 104, 105, and 282. or death suffered by the victim as a
direct result of any of the following:
(1) An act or omission that is defined as a misdemeanor under any local
ordinance or as a crime under state or federal law and involves the use of force or the
threat of the use of force.
(2) A human trafficking-related offense.
(3) A sexually oriented criminal offense.
Page 20 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(4) An act involving the operation of a motor vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft
that does not constitute a crime in this Chapter, unless the victim suffered personal
injury or death as a direct result of any of the following:
(a) The use of a motor vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft by an operator to
intentionally inflict personal injury or death upon the victim.
(b) The use of a motor vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft to flee the scene of a
crime of which the operator knowingly was a participant.
(c) The use of a motor vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft by an operator who is
in violation of R.S. 14:98, 98.1, 98.2, 98.3, 98.4, 98.6, or 100.
C. B. For the purposes of this Chapter, a person shall be is deemed to have
committed a criminal act or omission notwithstanding that he was legally incapable
of committing a crime by reason of age, insanity, drunkenness, or any other reason
he was legally incapable of committing a crime.
§1806. Application; requirements; confidentiality
A.(1)(a) An application for reparations compensation shall be filed in writing
with the board within one year three years after the date of the personal injury, death,
or catastrophic property loss commission of the crime or within such longer period
as the board determines is justified by the circumstances. The application shall be
is valid only if reasonable documentation of the crime resulting that resulted in the
personal injury, death, or catastrophic property loss or death suffered by the victim
is submitted with the application.
(b) (2) For the purposes of this Subsection, "reasonable documentation"
means any of the following:
(i) (a) A police report documenting from law enforcement that documented
the commission of the crime that is the basis for the application.
(ii) (b) Court records evidencing the criminal prosecution of a pertaining to
the crime relevant to the application that are the basis for the application.
(iii) A certification of the crime signed under oath by any licensed clinical
social worker, professional counselor, or healthcare provider that conducted an
examination of the injuries resulting from the commission of the crime.
Page 21 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(iv) A certification of the crime signed under oath by a prosecuting attorney
or investigating law enforcement officer who has personal involvement in the
prosecution or investigation of any criminal case relative to the application.
(v) Any other documentation the board deems sufficient to show the
commission of a crime relevant to the application.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection
and except as provided in Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph, an application filed
by a dependent or legal representative of a deceased victim of a homicide offense,
or filed by a claimant as defined in R.S. 46:1802(4), shall be filed within five years
after the date on which the judgment of conviction becomes final or within five years
after the date on which the supreme court denies the defendant's first application for
appeal.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, when
the death of the offender occurs prior to a conviction for a homicide offense, an
application filed by a dependent or legal representative of a deceased victim of a
homicide offense, or filed by a claimant as defined in R.S. 46:1802(4), shall be filed
within five years after the date of the death of the offender.
B.(1) An application for reparations related to a sexually oriented criminal
offense shall be filed in writing with the board within one year after the date on
which the personal injury, death, or catastrophic property loss occurred or within
such longer period as the board determines is justified by the circumstances.
(2) A victim of a sexually oriented criminal offense shall not be required to
report a sexually oriented criminal offense to any law enforcement officer for
purposes of a claimant filing a valid application for reparations pursuant to this
Subsection.
(3) A claimant that files an application for reparations for personal injury or
death resulting from a sexually oriented criminal offense shall submit certification
from a healthcare provider or coroner that a forensic medical examination of the
victim was conducted and an itemized billing statement for all related services
provided by the healthcare provider or coroner.
Page 22 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(4) The coroner shall provide certification to the healthcare provider that a
forensic medical examination was conducted.
(5) The healthcare provider shall submit certification to the board that a
forensic medical examination was conducted when requested by a claimant.
(c) An attestation from a healthcare provider who conducted an examination
of the personal injury suffered by the victim and who can verify that the personal
injury suffered by the victim was a direct result of the crime that is the basis for the
application.
(d) An attestation from the healthcare provider who conducted a forensic
medical examination on the victim as a direct result of the crime that is the basis for
the application, or an attestation from the coroner indicating that a forensic medical
examination was conducted on the victim as a direct result of the crime that is the
basis for the application.
C. B. Application shall be made on a form prescribed and provided by the
board, which shall contain at least the following:
(1) A description of the date, nature, and circumstances of the act or acts
resulting that resulted in the physical injury, death, or catastrophic property loss
personal injury or death suffered by the victim, and of the crime, if known.
(2) A complete financial statement, including the cost of medical care or
funeral, burial, or cremation expenses, the loss of wages or support, and the extent
of the property loss, if any, which of any pecuniary loss that the claimant has
incurred or will incur, and the extent to which the claimant has been indemnified for
these expenses from by any collateral source.
(3) Where appropriate, a statement indicating that indicates the extent of any
disability resulting that resulted from the personal injury incurred suffered by the
victim.
(4) An authorization permitting the board or its representatives to verify the
contents of the application.
(5) Such other information as the board may require.
Page 23 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
D. C. The following information, when submitted to the board as part of an
application, shall be is confidential:
(1) Documents, including any itemized billing statements, submitted by a
claimant which relate that pertain to medical treatment including any itemized billing
statements.
(2) Law enforcement investigative reports.
(3) Forensic medical examination examinations.
E. D. Records, documents, and information in the possession of the board
that are received pursuant to a law enforcement investigation or a verification of
application by a law enforcement agency shall be are considered investigative
records of a law enforcement agency as described in R.S. 44:3 and shall not be
disseminated under any condition without the permission of the agency providing the
record or information to the board.
F. E. A victim who was owed restitution as a condition of an offender's
parole pursuant to R.S. 15:574.4.2(C)(1)(a) but whose restitution payments were
directed to the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Fund pursuant to
R.S. 15:574.4.2(C)(1)(b) may file an application for recovery of the restitution in a
written format developed by the board.
§1807. Powers and duties of board; staff
A. The board shall administer the provisions of this Chapter and Chapter 21-
A of this Title and shall be is responsible, in accordance with this Chapter and
Chapter 21-A of this Title, for determining all of the following:
(1) Determining all matters pertaining to applications for reparations
compensation, investigations, and determinations based upon its findings, the
granting or rejecting of.
(2) Approving or denying applications or claims, and fixing.
(3) Fixing the amounts amount of the grants or payments and the methods
method of their payment payments.
B. In the performance of its powers and duties, the board shall do all of the
following:
Page 24 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(1) Prescribe, distribute, and otherwise make available forms for use in
making application for reparations compensation and, where appropriate, recovery
of restitution funds directed to the Crime Victims Reparations Victims'
Compensation Fund pursuant to R.S. 15:574.4.2(C)(1)(b).
(2) Prepare and distribute pamphlets, informational materials, and
application forms, and otherwise assist in making the residents of the state public
aware of the provisions of this Chapter.
(3) Receive, verify, and process applications for reparations compensation
and, where appropriate, recovery of restitution funds directed to the Crime Victims
Reparations Victims' Compensation Fund pursuant to R.S. 15:574.4.2(C)(1)(b).
(4) Hold such hearings, take such testimony, and make such investigations
as are necessary with respect to any application received by it the board.
(5) Make a written decision with respect to each application received by it
the board and order payment of reparations award compensation for pecuniary loss
or, where appropriate, recovery of restitution funds to victims in accordance with this
Chapter.
(6) Take such other actions and perform such other functions as are required
by this Chapter or necessary to accomplish the purposes of the board.
(7) Develop, adopt, and promulgate rules in the manner provided in the
Administrative Procedure Act and in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
46:1806(B). The rules shall contain specific guidelines which shall establish the
reasonable costs to be reimbursed for all healthcare services or expenses ancillary
to a forensic medical examination. as necessary to carry out the business of the board
or the provisions of this Chapter.
(8) Take actions and perform other functions as are required by Chapter 21-
A of this Title or necessary to perform its purposes.
C. The In the performance of its powers and duties, the board also may do
all of the following:
(1) Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out its business or
the provisions of this Chapter.
Page 25 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(2) (1) Through the chairman or acting chairman, administer oaths or
affirmations to persons appearing before it, the board, subpoena witnesses, and send
for papers, documents, and records, and subpoena witnesses.
(3) (2) Appoint committees, including advisory committees.
(4) (3) Use, with or without reimbursement, the services, personnel,
facilities, and information, including recommendations, estimates, and statistics, of
federal agencies and those of, state and local public agencies, and private institutions,
with or without reimbursement therefor. The information described in this Paragraph
includes but is not limited to recommendations, estimates, and statistics.
(5) (4) Request such any information, data, and reports from any federal
agency as the board may require and as may be produced consistent in accordance
with law.
D.(1) The Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration
of Criminal Justice shall provide the office space and personnel necessary to carry
out the functions of the board and effectuate the purposes of this Chapter. In
addition, to the extent that funds are appropriated or otherwise made available
therefor for such purposes, the board may employ personnel, including experts
required in connection with particular applications or claims before it the board.
* * *
F. The board shall maintain a current record of the laws relating to crime
victims reparations list of websites for crime victims' compensation programs in
other states and territories of the United States for Louisiana residents who were
victimized outside of this state. The board need not keep is not required to maintain
a current record of laws list of websites for crime victims' compensation programs
in other countries. Upon request, the board shall assist Louisiana residents to
determine if they meet the criteria specified in R.S. 46:1802(10)(b). The board shall
make the list electronically available on the website of the Louisiana Commission
on Law Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice.
§1808. Procedure by the board; public hearings; right to counsel
Page 26 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
A. Upon receipt of one or more applications for reparations compensation
resulting from the same crime, the board shall examine the each application to
determine that it is complete and shall schedule all of such claims each application
for consideration at the same time. If the board determines that a hearing is
necessary to for a decision in the matter, it shall fix the day, time, and place thereof
of the hearing and shall notify the claimant or claimants and such any other persons
as who have indicated a desire to be present or that the board desires to hear from.
The notice shall be in writing and shall be mailed by certified mail at least ten days
prior to the day that is fixed for the hearing.
B. Hearings shall be are open to the public unless except in a any particular
case where the board determines that all or part of the hearing should be closed, after
taking into consideration the fact that an accused has not been convicted or that a
closed hearing is in the best interest of the victim. The applicant victim or claimant
may appear, and be heard, and present evidence on his own behalf or through
counsel or legal representative. Any person who has a substantial interest in the
proceedings, as determined by the board, may appear before the board and shall have
has the right to introduce evidence and cross examine witnesses.
C. The members of the board and the attorney representing the board, if any,
may question and cross examine witnesses. The board may bring before it
physicians or other experts before it to examine any victim or claimant. The board
may receive in evidence any statement, document, information, or matter that it
believes may contribute to the purposes of the hearing or to any of its deliberations,
whether or not regardless of whether a hearing is held and whether or not any of
them or whether the evidence before the board would be admissible in court.
§1809. Criteria for making awards; prohibitions; authority to deny or reduce awards
A. The board shall order the payment of reparations award compensation in
an amount determined by it the board if, with or without hearings, it the board finds
all of the following by a preponderance of the evidence:
Page 27 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(1) that The pecuniary loss was sustained incurred by the victim or other
claimant by reason of the personal injury, death, or catastrophic property loss or
death suffered by the victim and that such.
(2) The pecuniary loss was proximately caused by a crime enumerated in
R.S. 46:1805 and that such covered under this Chapter.
(3) The pecuniary loss has or will not be compensated from any collateral
or other source.
B. In making its determination, the following provisions shall apply:
(1) A For the purposes of considering an application for an award of
compensation pursuant to this Chapter, finding by the board, for purposes of
considering an application for award under this Chapter, that the commission of a
crime enumerated in R.S. 46:1805(A) covered under this Chapter resulted in a
pecuniary loss covered by this Chapter shall be a sufficient finding with respect to
the crimes giving rise to the application for a reparations compensation award.
However, the board may make a partial eligibility determination on an application
prior to the incurring of a pecuniary loss by the victim or other claimant. When one
part of an award is denied, the board shall favor a partial award over the total denial.
An order for reparations award of compensation may be made whether or not any
person is arrested, prosecuted, or convicted of the crime giving rise to the application
for reparations compensation. The board may suspend proceedings in the interest
of justice if a civil or criminal action arising from such act or omission constituting
the crime is pending or imminent.
(2) Conviction of an offender of a crime giving rise to the application for
reparations compensation under this Chapter shall be conclusive evidence that the
crime was committed.
(3)(a) No award of reparations compensation shall be made if the board finds
that either of the following have occurred:
(i) The victim or claimant failed or refused to cooperate substantially with
reasonable requests of appropriate law enforcement officials during the course of the
criminal investigation.
Page 28 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(ii) A totality of the circumstances indicate indicates that the victim or
claimant was the offender or an accessory, or that an award to the victim or claimant
would unjustly benefit any of them the offender or an accessory. However, such
ineligibility shall does not apply if the claimant is a victim of application for
compensation results from a human trafficking or trafficking of children for sexual
purposes trafficking-related offense.
(b) The ineligibility provisions provided for in Items (a)(i) and (ii) of this
Paragraph shall do not apply if the claim application for reparations compensation
results from a sexually oriented criminal offense.
(4) The board may deny or reduce an award as follows:
(a) If a totality of the circumstances indicate indicates that the behavior of
the victim at the time of the crime giving rise to the claim application was such that
the victim bears some measure of responsibility for the crime that caused the
physical injury, death, or catastrophic property loss or for the physical injury, death,
or catastrophic property loss. However, such the ineligibility shall provided in this
Subparagraph does not apply if the claimant is a victim suffered personal injury or
death as a direct result of a human trafficking-related offense as defined by R.S.
46:1805 or a sexually oriented criminal offense as defined by R.S. 15:622.
(b) To the extent that the pecuniary loss is recouped from collateral or other
sources.
(c) (b) If it the board finds that the vehicle operated by the victim was
without security as required by R.S. 32:861.
(d) (c) If it the board finds that the victim was not wearing a safety belt in
compliance with R.S. 32:295.1.
(e) (d) If it the board finds that the victim was a willing passenger in a motor
vehicle, boat watercraft, or aircraft that was operated by an individual a person who
was in violation of R.S. 14:98, or 98.1, 98.2, 98.3, 98.4, or 98.6.
(5) No reparations compensation of any kind shall be awarded under this
Chapter to a victim who is injured or killed or claimant if the victim suffers personal
injury or death as a direct result of a crime covered under this Chapter while
Page 29 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
confined in any state, parish, or city jail, prison, or other correctional facility as a
result of a conviction of any crime. However, if, prior to a conviction, the victim
was injured or killed while incarcerated, the board may deny reparations if it is
subsequently determined that the victim was guilty of the offense which resulted in
his incarceration.
C. No victim or dependent shall be denied reparations compensation solely
because he or she is a relative of the offender or was living with the offender at the
time of the injury or death commission of the crime. However, reparations
compensation may be awarded to a victim or dependent who is a relative, family
member, or household member of the offender at the time of the award only if it can
be reasonably determined that the offender will receive no substantial economic
benefit or unjust enrichment from the award.
D.(1) When a victim applies for the recovery of restitution pursuant to R.S.
46:1806(F), the board shall order the payment of the restitution to the victim if all
of the following conditions apply:
* * *
(b) The restitution payments were directed to the Crime Victims Reparations
Victims' Compensation Fund pursuant to R.S. 15:574.4.2(C)(1)(b).
(2) When the board orders payment pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection, the provisions of Subsections A and B of this Section
regarding criteria for and determinations of eligibility for reparations compensation
and determinations of the amount of reparations compensation do not apply.
E. No victim or claimant shall be denied or otherwise deemed ineligible for
reparations compensation pursuant to this Chapter, nor shall any award for
reparations of compensation pursuant to this Chapter be reduced, on the basis that
the of any of the following:
(1) The victim or claimant has any conviction or adjudication of
delinquency, on the basis that the unrelated to the crime that would otherwise
warrant an award of compensation pursuant to this Chapter.
Page 30 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(2) The victim or claimant is currently on probation or parole, or on the basis
that the unrelated to the crime that would otherwise warrant an award of
compensation pursuant to this Chapter.
(3) The victim or claimant has previously served any sentence of
incarceration, probation, or parole unrelated to the offense for which reparations
crime that would otherwise be awarded warrant an award of compensation pursuant
to this Chapter.
§1810. Amount of reparations award Limits on compensation
A. Awards payable under this Chapter shall not exceed fifteen thousand
dollars in the aggregate for all claims arising out of the same crime except for those
victims who are permanently, totally, or permanently and totally disabled as a result
of the crime, the aggregate award shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars.
B. In no case shall the total aggregate of awards given during any fiscal year
to claimants residing in the same parish exceed the total amount of costs levied,
collected, and remitted by that parish to the Louisiana Commission on Law
Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice as required by R.S. 46:1816(D)
for the preceding two fiscal years prior to the date of the crime to which this Chapter
applies, or ten thousand dollars, whichever is greater. This Subsection shall not
apply if the board determines that a qualified claimant would suffer severe and undue
hardship if economic relief is not provided. Awards payable to all claimants for
pecuniary losses incurred by reason of personal injury or death suffered by any one
victim as a direct result of a crime covered under this Chapter shall not exceed the
following amounts:
(1) Fifteen thousand dollars in the aggregate.
(2) Twenty-five thousand dollars in the aggregate if the personal injury
suffered by a victim results in a permanent and total disability to the victim.
§1811. Reparation Compensation order; terms and conditions
A. The board may order the payment of an award in a lump sum or in
installments. That The part of an award equal to the amount of the pecuniary loss
accrued to the date of the award shall be paid in a lump sum. In all other respects,
Page 31 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
the board shall determine all matters respecting the payment of awards, consistent
with the provisions of this Chapter.
B.(1) The board shall deduct from any award ordered any amounts received
from a collateral source from any payments it orders any amounts received from any
collateral source.
(2) If a victim or claimant receives payment from a collateral source after
receiving an award from the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation
Fund, then the victim or claimant shall reimburse the Crime Victims' Compensation
Fund to the extent the total amount received exceeds the actual loss experienced the
claimant shall reimburse the Crime Victims Reparations Fund, through the board.
The reimbursement provided in this Subparagraph shall be submitted through the
board.
C. The state treasurer shall pay to the person named in the order of payment
of reparations the amount named therein in accordance with the provisions of such
the amount contained in the compensation order to the person or service provider
named in the order in accordance with the provisions of the order.
* * *
§1812. Finality of decision
A decision or order of the board with respect to regarding any application or
claim for reparations shall be compensation is subject to review in accordance with
the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
§1813. Emergency awards
A. If it appears to the board prior to its taking action on a claim that an award
likely will be made and that undue hardship will result to the claimant if no
immediate economic relief is provided, the board may make an emergency award to
the claimant pending its final decision in the case. The amount of an emergency
award shall not exceed one thousand dollars. The board may make an emergency
award, pending a final decision on an application for compensation, for a pecuniary
loss that is incurred if all of the following are likely to occur:
Page 32 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(1) A final award will be made in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter.
(2) The claimant will suffer undue hardship if immediate economic relief is
not obtained.
B. An emergency award shall not exceed one thousand dollars.
B. C. The amount of any an emergency award made to the claimant shall be
deducted from any the final award made to the claimant receiving the emergency
award. The claimant shall repay to the board the excess amount of the emergency
award over that exceeds the final award, or the full amount if no final award is made.
However, the board may waive all or part of the repayment if in its judgment
repayment would cause severe financial hardship.
§1814. Effect of reparations compensation award on right to recover damages in
civil action; repayment of award
A. An order for reparations payments under compensation pursuant to this
Chapter shall does not affect the right of any person to institute a civil suit to recover
damages for the personal injury, death, or catastrophic property loss or death suffered
by the victim from any other person or third party. However, if damages in a civil
action are recovered, from the offender or any other third party, the person shall
reimburse the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Fund, through the
board, in an amount equal to the amount of the reparations award compensation
awarded or such lesser amount as is recovered in damages in the civil action.
B. When any person who has received an award from the board files a civil
action to recover damages, he shall, at the time of the filing of the suit, notify the
board and the attorney general at the time of the filing of the civil suit.
§1815. Recovery from the criminal offender
A.(1) Whenever any person is convicted of a crime and an order for the
payment of reparations is or has been made under this Chapter for a personal injury,
death, or catastrophic property loss resulting from the act or omission constituting
the crime for which conviction was had, the attorney general, within one year after
the date on which the judgment of conviction becomes final, may institute a civil
Page 33 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
action against the convicted person for the recovery of all or any part of the
reparations payment. The attorney general may, within one year after the date that
the judgment of conviction becomes final, institute a civil action against the
convicted offender for the recovery of all or any part of the compensation that is
awarded if an offender is convicted of a crime and an order for compensation is or
has been made pursuant to this Chapter for a personal injury or death suffered by the
victim that resulted from the act or omission constituting the crime for which the
offender was convicted. The civil suit shall be instituted in the district court having
jurisdiction in the parish in which such person where the offender resides or is found,
or, in Orleans Parish, in the civil district court for that parish Orleans Parish. The
court shall have has jurisdiction to hear, determine, and render judgment in any such
action.
(2) Any amount recovered under pursuant to this Subsection shall be
deposited in the state treasury and, after meeting the requirements of Article VII,
Section 9 of the Constitution of Louisiana, credited to the Crime Victims Reparations
Victims' Compensation Fund hereinafter created established pursuant to R.S.
46:1816. If an amount greater than the amount that was paid pursuant to the order
for payment of reparations compensation is recovered and collected in any such
action brought pursuant to this Section, the board shall pay the balance to the
claimant.
B. The board shall provide the attorney general with such all necessary
information, data, and reports as he may require to institute actions in accordance
with this Section.
§1816. Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Fund; creation; sources
and use of funds
A. The Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Fund, hereinafter
referred to in this Section as "the fund," is hereby created in the state treasury.
B. The fund shall be composed of the following:
* * *
Page 34 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(4) All monies received from any action to recover damages for a crime
which that was the basis of a reparations an award of compensation under this
Chapter.
(5) Any restitution paid by an offender to a victim for damages for a crime
which that was the basis of a reparations an award of compensation under this
Chapter, and any restitution payments owed to a victim as a condition of an
offender's release on parole but directed to the fund pursuant to R.S.
15:574.4.2(C)(1)(b).
* * *
(8) Monies deposited by the state treasurer from the collection of unclaimed
prize money as provided for in R.S. 4:176 and R.S. 27:94, 252, 394, and 610, which
shall be used exclusively to pay the expenses associated with healthcare services of
victims of sexually oriented criminal offenses, including forensic medical
examinations as defined in R.S. 15:622.
C.(1) Except as provided in Paragraphs (2) and (3) of this Subsection, all
monies deposited in the fund shall be used solely to pay reparation awards
compensation awarded to victims or claimants pursuant to this Chapter and the state
treasurer shall make disbursements therefrom shall be made by the state treasurer
from the fund upon written order of the board, signed by the chairman, or a court.
(2)(a) Monies received from the collection of unclaimed prize money as
provided for in R.S. 4:176 and R.S. 27:94, 252, and 394, and 610 shall be used
exclusively to pay the expenses associated with healthcare services of victims of
sexually oriented criminal offenses, including forensic medical examinations as
defined in R.S. 15:622, and the reasonable costs to effectuate the purposes of this
Chapter. The reasonable costs authorized in this Paragraph are limited to a salary for
one additional full-time employee.
(b) Notwithstanding Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, for state Fiscal
Years 2020-2021, 2021-2022, and 2022-2023, monies received from the collection
of unclaimed prize money as provided for in R.S. 4:176 and R.S. 27:94, 252, and 394
shall be used exclusively to pay the expenses associated with healthcare services of
Page 35 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
victims of sexually oriented criminal offenses, including forensic medical
examinations as defined in R.S. 15:622, lost earnings, and the reasonable costs of
administering this Section. Such reasonable costs include salary for one full-time
employee, salary for one part-time employee, equipment, operating expenses, and
software support.
(3) Monies directed to the fund pursuant to R.S. 15:574.4.2(C)(1)(b) may
shall be used to pay restitution owed to a victim pursuant to R.S. 15:574.4.2(C)(1)(a)
who applies for recovery of the restitution funds pursuant to the provisions of this
Chapter.
D.(1)
* * *
(b) The recipient of the costs shall remit all collected costs so collected to the
Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice
on or before the first day of each calendar month to be deposited in the state
treasurer's account for credit to the Crime Victims Reparations Fund fund after
meeting the requirements of Article VII, Section 9 of the Constitution of Louisiana.
The state treasurer shall invest the monies in this the fund shall be invested by the
state treasurer in the same manner as monies in the state general fund, and interest
earned on the investment of these monies shall be credited to the fund following
compliance with the requirement of Article VII, Section 9(B) relative to the Bond
Security and Redemption Fund.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection C of this Section, monies
deposited in the Crime Victims Reparations Fund fund may be used to pay
reasonable costs of administering this Chapter. Disbursement of funds to pay such
costs shall be made only on written authorization of the chairman or vice chairman
of the board.
E.
* * *
(2) The recipient of the costs shall remit all costs so collected pursuant to this
Subsection and other provisions of this Section to the Louisiana Commission on Law
Page 36 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice on or before the first day of
each calendar month to be deposited in the state treasurer's account for credit to the
Crime Victims Reparations Fund fund after meeting the requirements of Article VII,
Section 9 of the Constitution of Louisiana. The state treasurer shall invest the
monies in this the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer in the same manner
as monies in the state general fund, and interest earned on the investment of these
monies shall be credited to the fund following compliance with the requirement of
Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, relative to the Bond
Security and Redemption Fund. The amount of money generated by the two dollar
fee included in the Crime Victims Reparation Fund fund shall be used by the
Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice
to train local law enforcement officers and to provide assistance to local law
enforcement agencies.
§1817. Notification to potential applicants
A.(1) Every hospital licensed under the laws of this state shall display
prominently prominently display posters in its emergency room posters giving that
provide notification of the existence of the crime victims reparations victims'
compensation program. The board shall set standards for the location of the display
and shall provide the posters and general information regarding this Chapter to each
hospital.
(2) Every hospital and healthcare provider licensed under the laws of this
state shall make available to hospitals and healthcare providers a pamphlet
containing an explanation of the billing process for services rendered pursuant to the
provisions of R.S. 40:1300.41.
B. Application forms provided by the board shall be made available to
individuals a person upon request at the a parish sheriff's office.
* * *
§1818. Report to legislature and governor
The board shall submit an annual report to the legislature and the governor
detailing its activities during the preceding year. The report shall be made available
Page 37 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
electronically on the website of the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and
Administration of Criminal Justice. A sufficient number of copies shall be printed
for distribution to the governor, the chairman of the House Committee on Judiciary,
the chairman of the Senate Committee on Judiciary C, and to as many others as may
be requested.
§1819. Penalty for fraud
A. No person shall procure or counsel another person to procure reparations
under compensation pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter by any fraud. The
penalty for the violation of
B. Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be a fine of fined not
more than five hundred dollars or imprisonment imprisoned for not more than one
year six months, or both.
§1820. Attorney fees
As part of an order resulting from a hearing, the The board shall determine
and award reasonable attorney's attorney fees, commensurate as part of an order that
results from a hearing and proportionate with the services rendered, to be paid from
the fund Crime Victims' Compensation Fund in accordance with rules adopted by the
board. Additional attorney's A court may award additional attorney fees may be
awarded by a court in the event of a review by the court in which the claimant
prevails. Attorney's Attorney fees may be denied on a finding that the claim or
appeal is frivolous. Awards of attorney's attorney fees shall be in addition to awards
of reparations compensation awarded and may be made regardless of whether or not
compensation is awarded. In no event shall an No award of attorney's attorney fees
be in excess of shall exceed a rate of fifty dollars per hour.
§1821. Limited liability of the state
The state shall not be is not liable for the claim of any applicant victim or
claimant in excess of the funds appropriated for the payment of claims under this
Chapter.
Page 38 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
§1822. Forensic medical exams examinations; reimbursement
A. The board shall reimburse a healthcare provider who performs conducted
a forensic medical exam examination shall be reimbursed in the amount of six
hundred dollars. The board shall reimburse the healthcare facility at which a where
the forensic medical exam examination was conducted for the cost of performing the
exam shall be reimbursed in the amount of one thousand dollars.
B. In order to be reimbursed for the costs of performing conducting a
forensic medical exam examination, the healthcare provider or the healthcare facility
seeking reimbursement shall submit to the board an attestation that a forensic
medical exam examination was conducted. The attestation shall contain only
sufficient information to identify the victim, the date that the exam examination was
performed conducted, and the address to which where payment can be made for the
healthcare provider or healthcare facility. The board shall not require healthcare
provider or healthcare facility is not required to submit any billing documentation
or medical records from the healthcare provider or the healthcare facility as a
condition of payment under the provisions of this Section.
C. A request for reimbursement by a healthcare provider or healthcare
facility for the performance of conducting a forensic medical exam shall examination
does not constitute reparations an award of compensation and therefore shall be
immediately payable and does not require approval any order, decision, or
determination from the board as a condition of payment. The board shall direct The
personnel employed by the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and
Administration of Criminal Justice to carry out the functions of the board and
effectuate the purposes of this Chapter have sole authority to make any decision or
determination regarding a request for reimbursement. A payment to shall be made
to a the healthcare provider or healthcare facility no later than thirty calendar days
from the date that the attestation is submitted to the board by the healthcare provider
or healthcare facility.
* * *
Page 39 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
§1842. Definitions
In this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
* * *
(9) "Judicial agency" means the district court and officers thereof, including
the judge, the prosecutor, and the clerk of court, the Crime Victims Reparations
Victims' Compensation Board, the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, and
the division of probation and parole.
* * *
§1844. Basic rights for victim and witness
* * *
V. Crime victim's assistance hotline. In furtherance of the purposes of this
Section, a statewide crime victim's assistance hotline may be established. The Crime
Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Board along with the Louisiana
Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice shall
jointly operate the hotline and periodically review the criteria and implementation
procedures of said the hotline.
W. Confidentiality of crime victims who are minors, victims of sex offenses,
and victims of human trafficking-related offenses.
(1)(a) In order to protect the identity and provide for the safety and welfare
of crime victims who are minors under the age of eighteen years and of victims of
sex offenses or human trafficking-related offenses, notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, all public officials and officers and public agencies, including
but not limited to all law enforcement agencies, sheriffs, district attorneys, judicial
officers, clerks of court, the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation
Board, and the Department of Children and Family Services or any division thereof
of the department, shall not publicly disclose the name, address, contact information,
or identity of crime victims who at the time of the commission of the offense are
minors under eighteen years of age or of victims of sex offenses or human
trafficking-related offenses, regardless of the date of commission of the offense. The
confidentiality of the identity of the victim who at the time of the commission of the
Page 40 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
offense is a minor under eighteen years of age or the victim of a sex offense or
human trafficking-related offense may be waived by the victim. The public
disclosure of the name of the juvenile crime victim by any public official or officer
or public agency is not prohibited by this Subsection when the crime resulted in the
death of the victim. Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require the
redaction of a victim's name when the named victim is the one requesting such
documents, reports, or any other records.
* * *
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all public
officials, officers, and public agencies, including but not limited to all law
enforcement agencies, sheriffs, district attorneys, judicial officers, clerks of court,
the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Board, and the Department
of Children and Family Services or any division thereof of the department, charged
with the responsibility of knowing the name, address, contact information, and
identity of crime victims who are minors or of crime victims of a sex offense or a
human trafficking-related offense as a necessary part of their duties shall have full
and complete access to this information regarding a crime victim who is a minor or
a victim of a sex offense or a human trafficking-related offense. Either prior to or
at the time of a request for information, the public official or officer or public agency
shall take measures to prevent the public disclosure of the name, address, contact
information, or identity of such a crime victim who is a minor or a victim of a sex
offense or human trafficking-related offense, which may include the use of initials,
abbreviations, or any other form of concealing the identity of the victim on all public
documents.
* * *
(5)(a) In order to provide for the safety and welfare of victims of crimes
against family members, household members, or dating partners, notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, all public officials and officers and public
agencies, including but not limited to all law enforcement agencies, sheriffs, district
attorneys, judicial officers, clerks of court, the Crime Victims Reparations Victims'
Page 41 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
Compensation Board, and the Department of Children and Family Services or any
division thereof of the department, shall not publicly disclose the address or contact
information of victims of crimes against family members, household members, or
dating partners. The confidentiality of the address and contact information of the
victim of a crime against a family member, household member, or dating partner
may be waived by the victim.
* * *
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all public
officials, officers, and public agencies, including but not limited to all law
enforcement agencies, sheriffs, district attorneys, judicial officers, clerks of court,
the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Board, and the Department
of Children and Family Services or any division thereof of the department, charged
with the responsibility of knowing the address and contact information of victims of
crimes against family members, household members, or dating partners as a
necessary part of their duties shall have full and complete access to this information
regarding a victim of a crime against a family member, household member, or dating
partner. Either prior to or at the time of a request for information, the public official
or officer or public agency shall take measures to prevent the public disclosure of the
address and contact information of a victim of a crime against a family member,
household member, or dating partner.
* * *
§1851. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Account" and "escrow account" mean an escrow account in the name
of a defendant as provided for by this Chapter.
(2) "Board" means the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation
Board as provided for by Chapter 21 of this Title.
(3) "Catastrophic property damage" means catastrophic property damage as
defined in Chapter 21 of this Title.
Page 42 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
(4) (3) "Defendant" means an offender who has been convicted of a capital
offense and sentenced to death in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 15:567
through 571.
(5) (4) "Minor" means a person under the age of eighteen years.
(6) (5)(a) "Victim" means any of the following:
(i) A person who suffers death, injury, or catastrophic property damage
personal injury or death as a result of the defendant's crime, or any.
(ii) Any person who is otherwise eligible to have a judgment or reparations
award of compensation satisfied from a defendant's escrow account as provided for
by this Chapter, or any.
(iii) Any legal representative thereof, but does not include of a person
described in Items (i) or (ii) of this Subparagraph.
(b) "Victim" does not include any person denied eligibility for a reparations
an award by Chapter 21 of this Title.
§1852. Profits relative to criminal acts or notoriety
* * *
D. A victim who meets the eligibility requirements and other provisions of
this Chapter shall be entitled, subject to the limitations contained in this Chapter, to
an amount from the defendant's escrow account equal to the unsatisfied portion of
the civil judgment or reparations compensation award obtained by the victim.
§1853. Distribution of escrow account funds
A. Proceeds paid into an escrow account provided for by this Chapter shall
be retained for a period of ten years after the date of the court order or deposit by the
contracting party, but during that period may be levied upon to satisfy a money
judgment or reparations compensation award rendered in favor of a victim or the
legal representative of the victim of the defendant's crime.
B. If so ordered by a court, with notice to all interested parties and
opportunity for hearing, the escrow account shall be used to satisfy, and
disbursements made therefrom by the treasurer, in the following order The escrow
account and disbursements from the account that are made by the treasurer, if
Page 43 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
ordered by a court with notice to all interested parties and an opportunity for a
hearing, shall be used to satisfy in the following order:
* * *
(2) A money judgment rendered by a court or an award of reparations
compensation by the Crime Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Board in
favor of a victim of the defendant's crime.
* * *
C. At the end of the ten-year period provided for in Subsection A of this
Section, the remaining escrow account funds shall be paid into the Crime Victims
Reparations Victims' Compensation Fund as provided for by R.S. 46:1816.
However, if a civil action is pending against the defendant that would be eligible to
be satisfied out of the escrow account, then the funds shall be held in escrow until
completion of the action.
* * *
Section 10. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 890.2(D) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 890.2. Fines for individual defendants
* * *
D. The amount of reimbursement under in accordance with this Article shall
not be in excess of the per capita cost of care for maintaining inmates in the state
correctional facility in which the inmate is housed. The funds collected from the
fines imposed pursuant to this Article shall be distributed to the entity that expended
the funds. However, ten percent of the funds shall go to the Crime Victims'
Reparation Compensation Fund as provided in R.S. 46:1816.
Section 11. Children's Code Articles 811.1(A)(introductory paragraph) and (7) and
811.2(D) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 811.1. Rights of the victim of alleged delinquent act
A. The juvenile court, district attorneys, and law enforcement agencies shall
provide the following services to victims of alleged delinquent acts, providing
provided that the victim reported the act to law enforcement authorities within
Page 44 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 969 ENROLLED
seventy-two hours of its occurrence or discovery, unless extenuating circumstances
exist for later reporting:
* * *
(7) The appropriate law enforcement agency shall ensure that the victim
receives emergency, social, and medical services as soon as possible. The
appropriate law enforcement agency shall also distribute to the victim, or to the
family of a homicide victim, a crime victim's brochure prepared by the Crime
Victims Reparations Victims' Compensation Board as provided in R.S. 46:1844(T),
and supplemented as necessary by the district attorney with victim information
specific to the parish in which the delinquent act is alleged to have occurred, as
provided in R.S. 46:1844(A).
* * *
Art. 811.2. Victims of juvenile crime compensation fund; established;
disbursements
* * *
D. The clerk of court shall remit one-third of the total sums collected or
received pursuant to this Article on a monthly basis to the Crime Victims
Reparations Victims' Compensation Fund as provided in R.S. 46:1801 et seq R.S.
46:1816.
Section 12. Chapter 21-A of Title 46 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 46:1831.1 through 1831.16, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 45 of 45
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.